Utah statutes.
63G-2-206.   Sharing records.
(1)  A governmental entity may provide a record that is private, controlled,
or protected to another governmental entity, a government-managed corporation,
a political subdivision, the federal government, or another state if the
requesting entity:
(a)  serves as a repository or archives for purposes of historical
preservation, administrative maintenance, or destruction;
(b)  enforces, litigates, or investigates civil, criminal, or administrative
law, and the record is necessary to a proceeding or investigation;
(c)  is authorized by state statute to conduct an audit and the record is
needed for that purpose;
(d)  is one that collects information for presentence, probationary, or parole
purposes; or
(e) (i)  is:
(A)  the Legislature;
(B)  a legislative committee;
(C)  a member of the Legislature; or
(D)  a legislative staff member acting at the request of the Legislature, a
legislative committee, or a member of the Legislature; and
(ii)  requests the record in relation to the Legislature's duties including:
(A)  the preparation or review of a legislative proposal or legislation;
(B)  appropriations; or
(C)  an investigation or review conducted by the Legislature or a legislative
committee.
(2) (a)  A governmental entity may provide a private, controlled, or protected
record or record series to another governmental entity, a political
subdivision, a government-managed corporation, the federal government, or
another state if the requesting entity provides written assurance:
(i)  that the record or record series is necessary to the performance of the
governmental entity's duties and functions;
(ii)  that the record or record series will be used for a purpose similar to
the purpose for which the information in the record or record series was
collected or obtained; and
(iii)  that the use of the record or record series produces a public benefit
that outweighs the individual privacy right that protects the record or record
series.
(b)  A governmental entity may provide a private, controlled, or protected
record or record series to a contractor or a private provider according to the
requirements of Subsection (6)(b).
(3) (a)  A governmental entity shall provide a private, controlled, or
protected record to another governmental entity, a political subdivision, a
government-managed corporation, the federal government, or another state if
the requesting entity:
(i)  is entitled by law to inspect the record;
(ii)  is required to inspect the record as a condition of participating in a
state or federal program or for receiving state or federal funds; or
(iii)  is an entity described in Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e).
(b)  Subsection (3)(a)(iii) applies only if the record is a record described
in Subsection 63G-2-305(4).
(4)  Before disclosing a record or record series under this section to another
governmental entity, another state, the United States, a foreign government,
or to a contractor or private provider, the originating governmental entity
shall:
(a)  inform the recipient of the record's classification and the accompanying
restrictions on access; and
(b)  if the recipient is not a governmental entity to which this chapter
applies, obtain the recipient's written agreement which may be by mechanical
or electronic transmission that it will abide by those restrictions on access
unless a statute, federal regulation, or interstate agreement otherwise
governs the sharing of the record or record series.
(5)  A governmental entity may disclose a record to another state, the United
States, or a foreign government for the reasons listed in Subsections (1) and
(2) without complying with the procedures of Subsection (2) or (4) if
disclosure is authorized by executive agreement, treaty, federal statute,
compact, federal regulation, or state statute.
(6) (a)  Subject to Subsections (6)(b) and (c), an entity receiving a record
under this section is subject to the same restrictions on disclosure of the
record as the originating entity.
(b)  A contractor or a private provider may receive information under this
section only  if:
(i)  the contractor or private provider's use of the record or record series
produces a public benefit that outweighs the individual privacy right that
protects the record or record series;
(ii)  the record or record series it requests:
(A)  is necessary for the performance of a contract with a governmental
entity;
(B)  will only be used for the performance of the contract with the
governmental entity;
(C)  will not be disclosed to any other person; and
(D)  will not be used for advertising or solicitation purposes; and
(iii)  the contractor or private provider gives written assurance to the
governmental entity that is providing the record or record series that it will
adhere to the restrictions of this Subsection (6)(b).
(c)  The classification of a record already held by a governmental entity and
the applicable restrictions on disclosure of that record are not affected by
the governmental entity's receipt under this section of a record with a
different classification that contains information that is also included in
the previously held record.
(7)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if a more specific
court rule or order, state statute, federal statute, or federal regulation
prohibits or requires sharing information, that rule, order, statute, or
federal regulation controls.
(8)  The following records may not be shared under this section:
(a)  records held by the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining that pertain to any
person and that are gathered under authority of Title 40, Chapter 6, Board and
Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining; and
(b)  records of publicly funded libraries as described in Subsection
63G-2-302(1)(c).
(9)  Records that may evidence or relate to a violation of law may be
disclosed to a government prosecutor, peace officer, or auditor.
